Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 1 General Provisions

Editor’s notes.

Code Sections 32-9-1 through 32-9-12 were designated as Article 1 by Ga. L. 2018, p. 377, § 3-1/HB930, effective May 3, 2018.

32-9-1.
Financial support and project grants for research, programs, and purchases.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Mass transportation” means all modes of transportation serving the general public which are appropriate, in the judgment of the department, to transport people, commodities, or freight by highways, rail, air, water, or other conveyance, exclusive of wires and pipelines.

“Mass transportation facilities” means everything necessary for the conveyance and convenience of passengers and the safe and prompt transportation of freight on those modes of transportation serving the general public which are appropriate, in the judgment of the department, to transport people, commodities, or freight by highways, rail, air, water, or other conveyance, exclusive of wires and pipelines.

“Project grant” means the state’s share of the cost of carrying out a particular project authorized by this Code section. This share may be provided in direct financial support, goods or products, personnel services, or any combination thereof.

Subject to general fund appropriations for such purposes and any provisions of Chapter 5 of this title to the contrary notwithstanding, the department is authorized, within the limitations provided in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, to provide to municipalities, counties, regional commissions, authorities, state agencies, and public and private mass transportation operators:

Financial support for research concerning mass transportation, by contract or otherwise; and

Project grants to supplement federal, local, or federal and local funds for use:

In providing for studies, analyses, and planning and development of programs for mass transportation service and facilities;

In providing for research, development, and demonstration projects in all phases of mass transportation;

In providing for programs designed solely to advertise, promote, and stimulate the development and use of mass transportation facilities; and

In providing for the purchase of facilities and equipment, including rolling stock, used or to be used for the purpose of mass transportation.

The governing bodies of municipalities, counties, regional commissions, authorities, state agencies, and public and private mass transportation operators may, by formal resolution, apply to the department for financial support and project grants provided by this Code section.

The use of funds or grants shall be for the purposes set forth in this Code section and, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, may be used for local contributions required by the federal Urban Mass Transportation Act of 1964, as amended, or any other federal law concerning mass transportation.

The department shall review the proposal and, if satisfied that the proposal is in accordance with the purposes of this Code section, may, with the approval of the commissioner, enter into a financial support or project grant agreement subject to the condition that the financial support or project grant be used in accordance with the terms of the proposal.

The time of payment of the financial support or project grant and any conditions concerning such payment shall be set forth in the financial support or project grant agreement.

In order to effectuate and enforce this Code section, the department is authorized to promulgate necessary rules and regulations and to prescribe conditions and procedures in order to assure compliance in carrying out the purposes for which financial support and project grants may be made in accordance with this Code section.

The department is directed to administer this program with such flexibility as to permit full cooperation between federal, state, and local governments, agencies, and instrumentalities so as to result in an effective and economical program.

Funds appropriated to the department pursuant to Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(b) of the Constitution of Georgia may not be utilized for any of the purposes set out in this Code section.

No financial support or project grant provided for in this Code section may be made to any private mass transportation operator without prior concurrence of the State Transportation Board.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-1301, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 817, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 56; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 6.17; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 20/HB 1216.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1989, “transportation” was substituted for “transportaion” in subsection (g).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, “commissions” was substituted for “commission” in subsection (b) and paragraph (c)(1), as the original language was “development centers”.

U.S. Code.

The federal Urban Mass Transportation Act of 1964, referred to in paragraph (c)(2) of this Code section, is codified at

49 U.S.C. § 5301

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article surveying recent legislative and judicial developments in zoning, planning and environmental law, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 89 (1979).

32-9-2.
Operation by department of facilities or systems; financial assistance to systems; prohibition relating to certain Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority Services.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Capital project” has the same meaning as in 49 U.S.C.A. Section 5302(a)(1).

“Construction” means the supervising, inspecting, actual building, and all expenses incidental to the acquisition, actual building, or reconstruction of facilities and equipment for use in mass transportation, including designing, engineering, locating, surveying, mapping, and acquisition of rights of way.

“Mass transportation” means all modes of transportation serving the general public which are appropriate, in the judgment of the department, to transport people, commodities, or freight by highways, rail, air, water, or other conveyance, exclusive of wires and pipelines.

Subject to general appropriations for such purposes, the department may, alone or in cooperation with counties, municipalities, authorities, state agencies, or private or public transit companies, plan, develop, supervise, support, own, lease, maintain, and operate mass transportation facilities or systems.

The department may, when funds are available from the United States government for such purposes, provide assistance to the operators of mass transportation systems or to the owners of facilities used in connection therewith for the payment of operating expenses to improve or to continue such mass transportation service by operation, lease, contract, or otherwise.

The department may, when funds are available from the United States government for such purposes, participate in the acquisition, construction, and improvement of facilities and equipment, including capital projects, for use, by operation or lease or otherwise, in mass transportation service.

The department’s participation with state funds in those programs specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection may be in either cash, products, or in-kind services. The department’s participation with state funds shall be limited to the minimum nonfederal share of the program. The remainder shall be provided from sources other than department funds or from revenues from the operation of public mass transportation systems.

The department shall not enter into any contract with any private entity for the purposes set out in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section without the prior concurrence of the State Transportation Board.

Funds appropriated to the department pursuant to Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(b) of the Constitution of Georgia may not be utilized for any of the purposes set out in this Code section.

In order to effectuate and enforce this Code section, the department is authorized to promulgate necessary rules and regulations and to prescribe conditions and procedures in order to assure compliance in carrying out the purposes of this Code section.

The department shall not be authorized, without the concurrence of the Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority, to receive federal financial assistance to provide mass transportation services or facilities that will duplicate those mass transportation services or facilities provided or to be provided by the Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority, within the City of Atlanta and Fulton and DeKalb counties, as a part of its rapid transit system, including the use of buses as well as a rail system, as that system is described in an engineering report, dated September 1971, prepared for the Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority by Parsons-Brinckerhoff-Tudor-Bechtel, general engineering consultants, and adopted as part of the Rapid Transit Contract and Assistance Agreement, dated September 1, 1971, between the Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority, the City of Atlanta, Fulton County, Georgia, and DeKalb County, Georgia.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-1302, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 817, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 56; Ga. L. 1999, p. 112, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 905, § 4; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1343, § 9/HB 817.

Cross references.

Powers and duties of department relating to Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority, § 32-2-2(a)(14).

Law reviews.

For note on 1999 amendment to this Code section, see 16 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 233 (1999).

For article, “Standards for Smart Growth: Searching for Limits on Agency Discretion and the Georgia Regional Transportation Authority,” see 36 Ga. L. Rev. 247 (2001).

For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 170 (2003).

32-9-3.
[Reserved] Financial assistance for transportation services for elderly and handicapped persons.

History.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 915, § 1. For present similar provisions relating to financial assistance for transportation services for elderly and disabled persons, see Code Section 49-2-13.1; repealed by Ga. L. 1990, p. 915, § 1, effective July 1, 1990.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 915, § 1 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 1990.

32-9-4.
Designation of special or exclusive use travel lanes; use of such lanes.

The department is authorized to designate travel lanes in each direction of travel on any road in the state highway system for the exclusive or preferential use of:

Buses;

Motorcycles;

Passenger vehicles occupied by two persons or more;

Vehicles bearing alternative fueled vehicle license plates issued under paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 40-2-38 or paragraph (7) of subsection (l) of Code Section 40-2-86.1; or

Other vehicles as designated by the department.

Where such designation has been made, the road shall be appropriately marked with such signs or other roadway markers and markings to inform the traveling public of the lane restrictions imposed.

(a.1)

Upon approval through either legislative action in the United States Congress or regulatory action by the United States Department of Transportation to permit hybrid vehicles with fewer than two occupants to operate in a high occupancy vehicle lane, the department shall authorize hybrid vehicles, as defined in Code Section 40-2-76, to use the travel lanes designated for such vehicles as provided in paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section.

No driver of any vehicle not authorized to be operated in a lane designated and signed for exclusive use shall operate such vehicle in such lane except to execute turning movements or in an emergency situation. Any person who violates this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable as provided for in Code Section 40-6-54.

No traffic lane shall be designated and signed for exclusive use pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section without the approval of the State Transportation Board.

The department is authorized to promulgate necessary rules and regulations in order to carry out the purposes of this Code section.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-1304, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 817, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 363, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1589, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 450, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-61/HB 1055; Ga. L. 2019, p. 486, § 1/SB 227.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 2, 2019, inserted “paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 40-2-38 or” in the middle of paragraph (a)(4).

Cross references.

Further provisions regarding designation of travel lanes and operation of vehicles within lanes, §§

40-6-24

,

40-6-48

.

32-9-4.1.
FlexAuto lanes.

As used in this Code section, the term “FlexAuto lane” means an area designated as a special lane of travel created by converting emergency lane and hard shoulder areas on the left or right side of an interstate highway or other road into a rush hour traffic lane for use by automobiles during certain hours.

The department, with the approval of the board, is authorized to designate FlexAuto lanes on the state highway system for the purpose of improving traffic flow in and around areas with a history of traffic congestion.

Any FlexAuto lane shall be appropriately striped and marked and shall have signage appropriate to indicate its nature, as determined by the department. The department may incorporate emergency havens, emergency ramps, or emergency parking pads into the design and creation of FlexAuto lanes, as determined appropriate by the department.

The hours of usage of a FlexAuto lane shall be determined by the department.

It shall be unlawful for any person operating any motor vehicle to use a FlexAuto lane for purposes of travel other than emergency use outside the permitted hours of travel use, as determined and posted by the department. It shall be unlawful for any person operating any motor vehicle other than an automobile, motorcycle, or light truck to use a FlexAuto lane for purposes of travel other than emergency use at any time.

Prior to implementing this Code section, the department shall, if necessary, seek to secure and implement any federal approvals, waivers, or other actions necessary or appropriate in order to implement this Code section without any loss or impairment of federal funding.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-9-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 684, § 2/HB 273; Ga. L. 2017, p. 720, § 3/HB 328.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, deleted “, not to exceed eight hours per day” following “department” at the end of subsection (d); and deleted former subsection (g), which read: “FlexAuto lanes shall not be implemented at more than 80 separate locations in the state until such time as the department has completed a one year test use of such lanes.”.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 684, § 1/HB 273, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds and determines and recommends as follows:

“(1)
The Georgia Department of Transportation has a job of overwhelming proportions and addresses the ever-increasing transportation needs of the state through the hard work and dedication of outstanding leaders and staff;

“(2)
There is a need in this state to reduce emissions and improve air quality by increasing traffic flow and reducing traffic congestion and decreasing drive times;

“(3) The Department of Transportation is urged to use creative and innovative methods to deal with gridlock and traffic congestion in Georgia and especially in the metropolitan areas;

“(4)
Upon passage of this enabling legislation, the department is urged to implement FlexAuto lanes where applicable and to commence the implementation of such lanes in as timely a manner as is practicable;

“(5)
The Department of Transportation is requested specifically to identify 20 major areas with a history of traffic congestion in and around our state that will derive the most benefit from the use of FlexAuto lanes and, after identifying these areas, to create and rapidly implement a plan for use of such lanes in such areas;

“(6)
Studies and construction models used successfully in other areas within this country and others should be used as models where traffic flow was improved and emissions reduced by using creative and innovative methods to deal with gridlock and traffic congestion; and

“(7)
The model used in Virginia is being studied by Israel, France, Japan, Germany, and England.”

32-9-5.
Ride-sharing programs.

Subject to general appropriations for such purposes, the department, pursuant to its rules and regulations, is authorized, alone or in cooperation with counties, municipalities, authorities, state agencies, or private or public entities, to participate in the establishment and operation of ride-sharing programs.
A ride-sharing program is an undertaking designed to encourage safe and adequate transportation by increasing the number of person-trips per vehicle, regardless of the type of vehicle.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-1307, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1473, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 373, § 1.

32-9-6.
Financial assistance for rail service.

The department is designated as the state agency to offer financial assistance, in the form of a rail service continuation payment, to enable rail service, for which the Interstate Commerce Commission has determined a certificate of abandonment should be issued, to be continued.

The department is authorized to receive and administer federal financial assistance and to distribute, by contract or otherwise, such federal financial assistance, alone or together with state, local, or private funds available for such purposes, for the implementation of railroad assistance programs that are designed to provide for:

The cost of rail service continuation payments;

The cost of purchasing a line of railroad or other rail properties to maintain existing rail services or to provide for future rail services;

The cost of rehabilitating and improving rail properties on a line of railroad to the extent necessary to permit adequate and efficient rail service on such line; or

The cost of reducing the cost of the lost rail service in a manner less expensive than continuing rail service.

Subject to general fund appropriations for these purposes, the department is authorized to expend state funds to the extent necessary to pay the state’s share of such payments.

The department shall provide to the Georgia Public Service Commission the pertinent information it may possess regarding a proposed abandonment of a railroad line and shall assist the Public Service Commission, as required, in developing the state’s position on the abandonment. The Public Service Commission shall provide to the department the pertinent information it may possess concerning any railroad line for which abandonment has been requested in order to assist the department in preparing an economic and operational analysis of the line.

Should the department decide to implement a railroad assistance program in accordance with paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of this Code section, the Public Service Commission will use its best efforts, within the scope of its powers and responsibilities, to assist the department in implementing such a program.

The department is authorized to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations for the implementation and administration of this Code section.

The department shall not implement or propose to implement any railroad assistance program without the prior concurrence of the State Transportation Board.

Funds appropriated to the department pursuant to Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(b) of the Constitution of Georgia may not be utilized for any of the purposes set out in this Code section.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-1305, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 870, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 56.

Cross references.

Railroads and rail service generally, T. 46, C. 8 and T. 46, C. 9.

32-9-7.
Financial assistance for airport development.

So that the State of Georgia may effectively and responsibly implement its state airport system plan, after September 30, 1977, all applications to an agency of the United States for funds to improve or develop an airport not regularly served by an air carrier operating under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the Civil Aeronautics Board or any successor agency of the United States government or owned and operated by the United States government shall be submitted to the department for review and comment prior to being submitted to the federal agency. No such application shall be submitted to the federal agency without first having been reviewed and commented on by the department. The department shall act on each application within 90 days after the receipt of the application. Applications submitted to the Federal Aviation Agency prior to September 30, 1977, shall not be subject to the provisions of this Code section.

The department is authorized, when requested by the owner or operator of any airport for which federal funds are or will be sought for the improvement or development of the airport, to provide such assistance to the owner or operator of the airport as may be necessary to prepare the application for such funds and to complete the project for which such funds are requested.

In order to effectuate and enforce this Code section, the department is authorized to promulgate necessary rules and regulations and to prescribe conditions and procedures in order to assure compliance in carrying out the purposes of this Code section.

Funds appropriated to the department pursuant to Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(b) of the Constitution of Georgia may not be utilized for any of the purposes set out in this Code section.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-1306, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 868, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 56.

Cross references.

Powers of local governments as to air facilities, T. 6, C. 3.

32-9-8.
Licensing airports.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Aircraft” means any machine, whether heavier or lighter than air, used or designed for navigation of or flight in the air.

“Airport” means any area of land, water, or mechanical structure which is used for the landing and takeoff of aircraft and is open to the general public, as evidenced by the existence of a current and approved Federal Aviation Administration Form 7480-I or any successor application, for such use without prior permission or restrictions and includes any appurtenant structures and areas which are used or intended to be used for airport buildings, other airport facilities, rights of way, or easements; provided, however, that the term “airport” shall not include the following facilities used as airports:

Facilities owned or operated by the United States government or an agency thereof;

Privately owned facilities not open to the general public when such airports do not interfere with the safe and efficient use of air space of an airport for which a license or an airport operating certificate issued under 14 C.F.R. Part 139 of the regulations of the Federal Aviation Administration or any successor regulation has been granted; and

Facilities being operated pursuant to 14 C.F.R. Part 139 relating to certification requirements for airports serving scheduled air carrier operations or any successor agency of the United States government.

“Person” means an individual, firm, corporation, partnership, company, association, joint-stock association, municipality, county, or state agency, authority, or political subdivision and includes any director, employee, agent, trustee, receiver, assignee, or other similar representative thereof.

It is declared that the operation of airports used by the public for general aviation purposes but which are operated without regulation as to minimum and uniform safety requirements endangers the lives and property of persons operating aircraft at these facilities, the passengers of aircraft operated by such persons, and the occupants of lands in the vicinity of such facilities. For the purpose of establishing and improving a system of safer airports and to foster safer operating conditions at these airports, the department is authorized and directed to provide for the licensing of airports. The department may charge a license fee of $100.00 per runway, up to a maximum of $400.00, for each original license and each renewal thereof. All licenses shall be renewed biennially.

The department shall issue a license or renewal thereof to any owner of an airport that applies for a license or renewal thereof, if, upon investigation, the department determines that the airport meets minimum standards, prescribed by the department in its rules and regulations, in the areas of geometric layout, navigational aids, lighting, approach surfaces, landing surfaces, runway markings, and separation between airport sites, provided that no license shall be denied the owner or operator of an airport in existence on July 1, 1978, because of the failure to meet minimum standards prescribed with regard to geometric layout and separation between airport sites.

The department shall promulgate and publish reasonable rules and regulations establishing the minimum standards provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section, the procedure for obtaining, renewing, and revoking a license, and such other procedures and conditions as are reasonable and necessary to carry out this Code section.

Within 60 days after the receipt of a properly filled out application for a license, with appropriate fee, the department shall act upon the application.

All applications for renewal of a license shall be made to the department no later than 60 days prior to the expiration of the existing license.

Applications for a license or renewal thereof may be denied, or a license may be revoked, by the department, after notice and opportunity for hearing to the licensee, when the department shall reasonably determine:

That the licensee has failed to comply with the conditions of the license or renewal thereof;

That the licensee has failed to comply with the minimum standards prescribed by the department pursuant to this Code section; or

That because of changed physical or legal conditions or circumstances the airport has become either unsafe or unusable for the purposes for which the license or renewal was issued.

The decision of the department to deny or revoke any license or renewal thereof shall be subject to review in the manner prescribed for the review of contested cases as prescribed by Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

It shall be unlawful for any person to own or operate an airport without first obtaining and thereafter maintaining a valid license as required by this Code section.

Whenever it appears or is made known to the department that any person is operating an airport without a valid license, the department may issue an initial written cease and desist order requiring such person to cease and desist immediately from such unauthorized activity. Such cease and desist order shall become final 20 calendar days from the date of issuance as noted on the order. If the proper license or evidence of exemption from licensure requirements during the time of the alleged unlicensed activity is provided to the department’s satisfaction within the 20 day period, the order shall not become final and shall be rescinded in writing by the department. Review of an administrative decision of the department entered pursuant to this paragraph shall be available solely in the superior court of the county of domicile of the department and shall be filed no later than 30 days after the department’s cease and desist order becomes final.

When a person fails to comply with the terms of a final cease and desist order of the department, the department may, through the Attorney General and upon three days’ written notice to such person, petition the superior court in the county where the unlicensed airport is located for an order directing such person to obey the final cease and desist order of the department. Upon the filing of such petition, the court shall allow a motion to show cause as to why a final cease and desist order of the department should be affirmed. After a hearing upon the merits or after failure of such person to appear when ordered, the court may grant the petition of the department.

Any person that violates the terms of an order issued pursuant to this subsection shall be liable to the department for a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000.00 per violation per day.

In determining the amount of penalty, the department shall consider the appropriateness of the penalty relative to the gravity of the violation, the history of any previous violation by such person, and any other such contributing factors or circumstances. The department may, in its discretion, compromise or modify any penalty that is subject to imposition or has been imposed pursuant to this paragraph. Any violator that is assessed a civil penalty may also be assessed the cost of collection, including, but not limited to, interest, court costs, and attorney’s fees.

Any person assessed a civil penalty as provided in this paragraph shall have the right to request a hearing into the matter as provided for in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act” within ten days after notification of the assessment has been served upon the person involved; otherwise, such penalty shall be final.

All penalties and fines recovered by the department pursuant to paragraph (4) of this subsection shall be paid to the general fund of the state; provided, however, that the department in its discretion may remit such amounts net of the cost of recovery if the department makes an accounting of all such costs and expenses of recovery.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-1307, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1932, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-62/HB 1055; Ga. L. 2021, p. 526, § 6/HB 577.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in paragraph (a)(2), inserted “, as evidenced by the existence of a current and approved Federal Aviation Administration Form 7480-I or any successor application,” in the middle, and substituted “, provided, however,” for “, provided” near the end; in subparagraph (a)(2)(B), inserted “14 C.F.R.” in the middle, and added “and” at the end; substituted the present provisions of subparagraph (a)(2)(C) for the former provisions, which read: “Facilities being operated pursuant to a current airport operating certificate issued by the Federal Aviation Administration or any successor agency of the United States government; and”; deleted subparagraph (a)(2)(D), which read: “Any facility served by a scheduled air carrier operating under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the Civil Aeronautics Board or any successor agency of the United States government.”; inserted “director, employee, agent,” near the end of paragraph (a)(3); deleted the former last sentence of subsection (b), which read: “In promulgating the rules and regulations establishing minimum standards, the department shall consult with the Georgia Aviation Trades Association.”; in subsection (c), substituted “license” for “permit” three times and substituted “that applies” for “who applies” near the middle; substituted “The” for “Within nine months after July 1, 1978, the” at the beginning of subsection (d); deleted the former first sentence of subsection (e), which read: “Within six months after the effective date of the rules and regulations adopted by the department, the owner of each airport in this state shall apply, on forms prescribed by the department, for a license to operate the airport.”; and substituted the present provisions of subsection (i) for the former provisions, which read: “After September 30, 1979, it shall be unlawful for any person to own or operate an airport without a valid license as required by this Code section. Any person owning or operating an airport without a valid license as prescribed by this Code section shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $100.00, to be imposed by the commissioner.”

Cross references.

Powers of local governments as to air facilities, T. 6, C. 3.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules and regulations for licensing of certain open-to-the-public airports, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Department of Transportation, Chapter 672-9.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on commercial transportation, see
73 Mercer L. Rev. 47 (2021).

32-9-8.1.
Redesignated.

Redesignated as Code Section 6-1-3 by Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 32(1)/HB 737, effective May 3, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 32(1)/HB 737, effective May 3, 2016, redesignated former Code Section 32-9-8.1 as Code Section 6-1-3.

32-9-9.
Creation of transit authority by special legislation; authority’s attributes and powers.

This Code section shall be known and may be cited as the “Transit Authority Act.”

It is declared to be the policy of the state to foster and to assure the development of mass rapid transit systems within the metropolitan areas of this state.

As used in this Code section, the term “metropolitan area” means (1) the area of any city within the state whose population, as determined by the federal census of 1950 or any later federal census, shall have exceeded 43,617 persons (such a city being hereinafter referred to as a central city), together with (2) the area suburban to such a central city as each such suburban area shall be more specifically delimited by special Act of the General Assembly.

The General Assembly may, by special Act, create a transit authority charged with the duty of acquiring, constructing, owning, operating, and maintaining a mass rapid transit system within a metropolitan area as defined in this Code section. The General Assembly, in the special Act creating such an authority, shall delimit the territory to be served by such authority; and the General Assembly may, in such special Act, provide that the property of and the securities issued by such authority shall be exempt from taxation and that such authority may, in addition to the rights, powers, privileges, exemptions, and immunities which are customarily possessed by public corporations, have such other and further rights, powers, privileges, exemptions, and immunities as the General Assembly shall deem appropriate to the accomplishment of its purposes, provided that such authority shall not be empowered to obligate the State of Georgia or any county, municipality, political subdivision, or public body of the state to pay any of its debts; provided, further, that the central city served by such mass rapid transit system and any county or counties whose territory or any part thereof lies within the territorial limits of such authority, as the same may be delimited in the special Act creating such authority, shall have the right to appoint the members of such authority, or a majority thereof, subject to such qualifications for membership and such apportionment of the right of appointment as the special Act creating such authority may provide.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 1025; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 32.

32-9-10.
Implementation of federal Transportation Safety Program.

The purpose of this Code section is to implement the federal Public Transportation Safety Program, 49 U.S.C. Section 5329, referred to in this Code section as the act.

For purposes of this Code section, the term “system” means a public transportation system having vehicles operated on a fixed guideway on steel rails, the steel of the wheels of such vehicles coming directly into contact with such rails, but excluding such systems that are subject to regulation by the Federal Railroad Administration. In addition, a “system” shall include all other public transportation systems that, under regulations issued pursuant to subsection (e) of the act, are subject to the act.

The department is designated as the agency of this state responsible for implementation of the act.

Each system operating in this state shall adopt and carry out a safety program plan that provides for the following:

The plan shall establish safety requirements with respect to the design, manufacture, and construction of the equipment, structures, and fixtures of the system; the maintenance of equipment, structures, and fixtures; operating methods and procedures and the training of personnel; compliance with federal, state, and local laws and regulations applicable to the safety of persons and property; protection from fire and other casualties; and the security of passengers and employees and of property;

The plan shall provide for measures reasonably adequate to implement the requirements established pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection; and

The plan shall establish lines of authority, levels of responsibility and accountability, and methods of documentation adequate to ensure that it is implemented.

The department shall have the following powers and duties:

It shall review the safety program plan of each system and all revisions and amendments thereof and if it finds that the plan conforms to subsection (d) of this Code section shall approve it;

It shall monitor the implementation of each system’s plan;

It shall have the power to require any system to revise or amend its safety program plan as may be necessary in order to comply with any regulations issued pursuant to subsection (e) of the act and any amendments or revisions thereof; and

It shall investigate hazardous conditions and accidents on each system and, as appropriate, require that hazardous conditions be corrected or eliminated.

If any system fails to comply with an order of the department to correct or to eliminate a hazardous condition, the department may apply for an order requiring such system to show cause why it should not do so. Such application shall be made to the superior court of the most populous county in which such system operates, as such population is determined according to the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census. If at the hearing upon such an order to show cause the court finds that the condition that is the subject of the order in fact creates an unreasonable risk to the safety of persons, property, or both, the court may order the system to comply with the department’s order or to take such other corrective action as the court finds appropriate.

Nothing in this Code section is intended to conflict with any provision of federal law; and, in case of such conflict, such portion of this Code section as may be in conflict with such federal law is declared of no effect to the extent of the conflict.

The department is authorized to take the necessary steps to secure the full benefit of the federal-aid program and meet any contingencies not provided for in this Code section, abiding at all times by a fundamental purpose to perform all acts which are necessary, proper, or incidental to the efficient and safe operation and development of the department and the state highway system and of other modes and systems of transportation.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-9-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1362, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1072, § 4/SB 169.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, a comma was deleted following “Code section” near the end of paragraph (e)(1).